District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.86

Severability of provisions.

If any part or parts of this chapter shall be held unconstitutional, such unconstitutionality shall not affect the validity of the remaining parts of this chapter.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 140, ch. 222, § 86
1981 Ed., § 40-484.
1973 Ed., § 40-498b.